apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="modt/age__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>age</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aget</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ager</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="krøb/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bland/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="husk/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rens/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hold/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fald/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ende</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vend/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="send/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rejs/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ende</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spis/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="steg/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="forbered/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>bland</i>
        <par n="bland/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fald</i>
        <par n="fald/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>forbered</i>
        <par n="forbered/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hold</i>
        <par n="hold/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>husk</i>
        <par n="husk/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>krøb</l>
          <r>kryb</r>
        </p>
        <par n="krøb/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lav</i>
        <par n="bland/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
        <par n="l/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lev</i>
        <par n="bland/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>modt</i>
        <par n="modt/age__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>rejs</i>
        <par n="rejs/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>rens</i>
        <par n="rens/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>send</i>
        <par n="send/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>spis</i>
        <par n="spis/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>steg</i>
        <par n="steg/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>vend</i>
        <par n="vend/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
